Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1223.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1206, No.375), known as the Podiatry Practice Act, is amended to read:Section 4. Application for Examination.--Except as hereinafter provided, any person not heretofore authorized to practice podiatric medicine in this Commonwealth desiring to be entitled to so practice, shall file with the board a written application for examination accompanied by a fee determined by the board by regulation and two unmounted finished photographs, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 one of which shall be verified by the dean of the school of podiatric medicine and surgery which he attended, and by satisfactory proof that the applicant is twenty-one years of age, a [citizen of the United States of America, or has legally declared an intention to become such a] resident of this Commonwealth, of good moral character, is not addicted to the intemperate use of alcohol or narcotic drugs. The applicant must be a graduate of an accredited school of podiatric medicine and surgery.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1223PN1439 - 2 - 12345678910